New Jersey, session 222, A2475.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section, legal name means the name recorded on a birth certificate unless otherwise changed by marriage, divorce, or order of court. b.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall permit an individual whose legal name includes a roman numeral to have the individuals legal name, including the roman numeral, displayed on the individuals standard basic driver's license; standard motorcycle license; standard special learners permit; standard examination permit; standard probationary drivers license; standard identification card; REAL ID basic driver's license; REAL ID motorcycle license; REAL ID probationary drivers license; REAL ID identification card; or commercial driver license, provided that the individual has provided the commission with the required documentation under the point based identification verification program established pursuant to section 28 of P.L.2003, c.13 (C.39:2A-28), including proof of the applicant's identity, age, and residence and any other information that may be required pursuant to Title 39 of the Revised Statutes for the issuance of the particular document. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.